ko: 임산부용 허리밴드 스타일: 컨버터블 허리 밴드; 접이식 허리 밴드; 오버 더 범프 패널; 언더 더 범프 허리 밴드; 기타
nb: Mammabåndstil: Konverterbar linning; Nedbrettbar linning; Panel over magen; Linning under magen; Annet
sv: Typ av magpanel för gravidkläder: Konverterbart midjeband; Nedvikbart midjeband; Panel över magen; Midjeband under magen; Annat
es: Estilo de cintura de maternidad: Cintura convertible; Cintura plegable; Panel sobre la barriga; Cintura bajo la barriga; Otro
hr-HR: Stil pojasa za trudnice: Pretvoriva pasica; Preklopna pasica; Traka preko trbuha; Pasica ispod trbuha; Ostalo
nl: Zwangerschapstailleband stijl: Converteerbare tailleband; Omslagtailleband; Paneel over de buik; Tailleband onder de buik; Overige
fr: Type de ceinture de maternité: Taille convertible; Taille à rabattre; Bandeau sur le ventre; Taille sous le ventre; Autre
el: Στυλ ζώνης εγκυμοσύνης: Μετατρέψιμη ζώνη; Αναδιπλούμενη ζώνη; Φάσα πάνω από την κοιλιά; Ζώνη κάτω από την κοιλιά; Άλλο
ro-RO: Model cu talie elastică pentru sarcină: Talie convertibilă; Talie pliabilă; Panou peste burtă; Talie sub burtă; Altele
pt-BR: Cós de maternidade estilo: Cós conversível; Cós dobrável; Painel sobre a barriga; Cós sob a barriga; Outro
sk-SK: Štýl tehotenského pásu: Konvertibilný pás; Prehŕňací pás; Panel nad bruško; Pás pod bruško; Iný
pt-PT: Estilo de cintura para grávidas: Cós convertível; Cós dobrável; Painel sobre a barriga; Cós sob a barriga; Outro
tr: Hamilelik bel bandı stili: Dönüştürülebilir bel bandı; Katlanır bel bandı; Göbek üstü panel; Göbek altı bel bandı; Diğer
ru: Стиль пояса для беременных: Трансформируемый пояс; Отворачивающийся пояс; Вставка на весь живот; Пояс под животом; Другое
lt-LT: Nėščiųjų juosmens juostos stilius: Konvertuojamas juosmuo; Užlenkiamas juosmuo; Skydelis virš pilvo; Juosmuo po pilvu; Kita
de: Stil des Umstandsbunds: Wandelbarer Bund; Umschlagbund; Überbaucheinsatz; Unterbauchbund; Sonstiges
da: Stil af graviditetslinning: Konvertibel linning; Nedfoldelig linning; Panel over maven; Linning under maven; Andet
it: Modello della fascia in vita premaman: Fascia in vita convertibile; Fascia in vita con risvolto; Pannello sopra il pancione; Fascia in vita sotto il pancione; Altro
pl: Styl pasa ciążowego: Wielofunkcyjny pas; Wykładany pas; Panel na brzuch; Pas pod brzuch; Inne
en: Maternity waistband style: Convertible waistband; Fold-over waistband; Over-the-bump panel; Under-the-bump waistband; Other
vi: Kiểu đai lưng dành cho bà bầu: Cạp quần đa năng; Cạp quần gấp; Phần bụng qua rốn; Cạp quần dưới rốn; Khác
th: สไตล์ขอบเอวสำหรับคุณแม่: ขอบเอวปรับเปลี่ยนได้; ขอบเอวแบบพับทบ; แถบผ้าคลุมท้อง; ขอบเอวใต้ครรภ์; อื่นๆ
cs: Styl těhotenského pasu: Přizpůsobitelný pas; Ohrnovací pas; Panel přes bříško; Pas pod bříško; Jiné
zh-TW: 孕婦褲腰頭款式: 可轉換褲頭; 反摺褲頭; 全包覆托腹布; 低腰托腹褲頭; 其他
fi: Äitiysvyötärönauhan tyyli: Muunnettava vyötärönauha; Käännettävä vyötärönauha; Vatsan yli menevä paneeli; Vatsan alle jäävä vyötärönauha; Muu
hu: Kismama nadrág derékrész-kialakítása: Átalakítható derékrész; Lehajtható derékrész; Pocakot fedő panel; Pocak alatti derékrész; Egyéb
ja: マタニティ用ウエストバンドスタイル: コンバーチブルウエストバンド; 折り返しウエストバンド; オーバーザバンプパネル; アンダーザバンプウエストバンド; その他
zh-CN: 孕妇腰带款式: 两用腰带; 折叠腰带; 全包托腹; 低腰托腹腰带; 其他
bg-BG: Стил на колана за бременни: Конвертируем колан; Прегъващ се колан; Панел над корема; Колан под корема; Друго
sl-SI: Stil nosečniškega pasu: Večnamenski pas; Preklopni pas; Pas čez trebuh; Pas pod trebuhom; Drugo